Rhode Island, session 2026, SB2806.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 27-18 of the General Laws entitled "Accident and Sickness Insurance
Policies" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
27-18-96. Equal pay for healthcare providers.
(a) Whenever any policy of health insurance provides for reimbursement for any service
which is within the lawful scope of practice of a duly licensed and certified nurse practitioner, as
defined in § 5-34-3, including prescribing or dispensing drugs, a primary care or mental health
service, provided by a licensed physician, the insured under the policy is entitled to reimbursement
for such service, whether it is performed by a physician licensed by the board of medical licensure
and discipline or by a duly licensed nurse practitioner, if provided by a licensed physician assistant,
as defined in chapter 54 of title 5 or a certified nurse practitioner, or other licensed healthcare
professionals, as defined in § 27-18-1.1, if the service is within the lawful scope of practice of the
physician assistant or nurse practitioner.
(b) The reimbursement of a service described in subsection (a) of this section that is
provided by a licensed physician assistant or a certified nurse practitioner who is in an independent
practice shall be in the same amount as the reimbursement paid under the policy to a licensed
physician performing the service in the area served.
(c) As used in this section, “independent practice” means the provision of healthcare
services to patients in a setting in which the licensed physician assistant or the certified nurse

practitioner bills insurers for services identified by diagnosis and procedure codes using the
physician assistant’s or nurse practitioner’s own name and national provider identifier.
(d) This section does not apply to group practice health maintenance organizations that are
federally qualified pursuant to Title XIII of the Health Maintenance Organization Act, or other
insurers that employ physicians, licensed physician assistants or certified nurse practitioners to
provide primary care or mental health services and do not compensate such practitioners on a fee
for-service basis.
(e) An insurer may not reduce the reimbursement paid to a licensed physician in order to
comply with this section.
SECTION 2. Chapter 27-19 of the General Laws entitled "Nonprofit Hospital Service
Corporations" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
27-19-88. Equal pay for healthcare providers.
(a) Whenever any policy of health insurance provides for reimbursement for any service
which is within the lawful scope of practice of a duly licensed and certified nurse practitioner, as
defined in § 5-34-3, including prescribing or dispensing drugs, a primary care or mental health
service, provided by a licensed physician, the insured under the policy is entitled to reimbursement
for such service, whether it is performed by a physician licensed by the board of medical licensure
and discipline or by a duly licensed nurse practitioner, if provided by a licensed physician assistant,
as defined in chapter 54 of title 5 or a certified nurse practitioner, or other licensed healthcare
professionals, as defined in § 27-18-1.1, if the service is within the lawful scope of practice of the
physician assistant or nurse practitioner.
(b) The reimbursement of a service described in subsection (a) of this section that is
provided by a licensed physician assistant or a certified nurse practitioner who is in an independent
practice shall be in the same amount as the reimbursement paid under the policy to a licensed
physician performing the service in the area served.
(c) As used in this section, “independent practice” means the provision of healthcare
services to patients in a setting in which the licensed physician assistant or the certified nurse
practitioner bills insurers for services identified by diagnosis and procedure codes using the
physician assistant’s or nurse practitioner’s own name and national provider identifier.
(d) This section does not apply to group practice health maintenance organizations that are
federally qualified pursuant to Title XIII of the Health Maintenance Organization Act, or other
insurers that employ physicians, licensed physician assistants or certified nurse practitioners to
provide primary care or mental health services and do not compensate such practitioners on a fee
for-service basis.
LC005472 - Page 2 of 5

(e) An insurer may not reduce the reimbursement paid to a licensed physician in order to
comply with this section.
SECTION 3. Chapter 27-20 of the General Laws entitled "Nonprofit Medical Service
Corporations" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
27-20-84. Equal pay for healthcare providers.
(a) Whenever any policy of health insurance provides for reimbursement for any service
which is within the lawful scope of practice of a duly licensed and certified nurse practitioner, as
defined in § 5-34-3, including prescribing or dispensing drugs, a primary care or mental health
service, provided by a licensed physician, the insured under the policy is entitled to reimbursement
for such service, whether it is performed by a physician licensed by the board of medical licensure
and discipline or by a duly licensed nurse practitioner, if provided by a licensed physician assistant,
as defined in chapter 54 of title 5 or a certified nurse practitioner, or other licensed healthcare
professionals, as defined in § 27-18-1.1, if the service is within the lawful scope of practice of the
physician assistant or nurse practitioner.
(b) The reimbursement of a service described in subsection (a) of this section that is
provided by a licensed physician assistant or a certified nurse practitioner who is in an independent
practice shall be in the same amount as the reimbursement paid under the policy to a licensed
physician performing the service in the area served.
(c) As used in this section, “independent practice” means the provision of healthcare
services to patients in a setting in which the licensed physician assistant or the certified nurse
practitioner bills insurers for services identified by diagnosis and procedure codes using the
physician assistant’s or nurse practitioner’s own name and national provider identifier.
(d) This section does not apply to group practice health maintenance organizations that are
federally qualified pursuant to Title XIII of the Health Maintenance Organization Act, or other
insurers that employ physicians, licensed physician assistants or certified nurse practitioners to
provide primary care or mental health services and do not compensate such practitioners on a fee
for-service basis.
(e) An insurer may not reduce the reimbursement paid to a licensed physician in order to
comply with this section.
SECTION 4. Chapter 40-8 of the General Laws entitled "Medical Assistance" is hereby
amended by adding thereto the following section:
40-8-33. Equal pay for healthcare providers.
(a) Beginning January 1, 2027, the executive office of health and human services (EOHHS)
shall provide for reimbursement for any service which is within the lawful scope of practice of a
LC005472 - Page 3 of 5

duly licensed and certified nurse practitioner, as defined in § 5-34-3, including prescribing or
dispensing drugs, a primary care or mental health service, provided by a licensed physician, the
insured under the policy is entitled to reimbursement for such service, whether it is performed by
a physician licensed by the board of medical licensure and discipline or by a duly licensed nurse
practitioner, if provided by a licensed physician assistant, as defined in chapter 54 of title 5 or a
certified nurse practitioner, or other licensed healthcare professionals, as defined in § 27-18-1.1, if
the service is within the lawful scope of practice of the physician assistant or nurse practitioner.
(b) The reimbursement of a service described in subsection (a) of this section that is
provided by a licensed physician assistant or a certified nurse practitioner who is in an independent
practice shall be in the same amount as the reimbursement paid under the policy to a licensed
physician performing the service in the area served.
(c) As used in this section, “independent practice” means the provision of healthcare
services to patients in a setting in which the licensed physician assistant or the certified nurse
practitioner bills insurers for services identified by diagnosis and procedure codes using the
physician assistant’s or nurse practitioner’s own name and national provider identifier.
(d) The secretary of the EOHHS shall apply to the United States department of health and
human services for any amendment to the state Medicaid plan or for any Medicaid waiver as
necessary to implement this section. The secretary of the EOHHS shall submit the Medicaid state
plan amendment on or before October 1, 2026.
SECTION 5. This act shall take effect on January 1, 2027.
========
LC005472
========
LC005472 - Page 4 of 5